Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.381

General partner agent of limited partnership.

(1) Each general partner is an agent of the limited partnership for the purposes of its activities. An act of a general partner, including the signing of a record in the partnership's name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course of the limited partnership's activities or activities of the kind carried on by the limited partnership binds the limited partnership, unless the general partner did not have authority to act for the limited partnership in the particular matter and the person with which the general partner was dealing knew, had received a notification, or had notice under RCW 25.10.016(4) that the general partner lacked authority.

(2) An act of a general partner that is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course of the limited partnership's activities or activities of the kind carried on by the limited partnership binds the limited partnership only if the act was actually authorized by all the other partners.

[ 2009 c 188 s 402.]